Massachusetts, session 194th, H1094.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following new section:-
Section 231. If the policy owner of a life, disability or long term care insurance policy has
an agent of record, the insurer must also notify the agent of the impending lapse in coverage or
mail or send electronically a copy of the notification of the impending lapse in coverage to the
agent at least 21 days before the effective date of any such lapse. Receipt of such notice does not
make the agent responsible for any lapse in coverage. An insurer is not required to notify the
agent under this section if any of the following applies:
(a) The insurer maintains an online system that pushes out a notice of pending lapse to
the broker of record to independently determine if a policy is about to lapse.
(b) The insurer maintains a procedure that pushes out a notice that allows an agent to
independently determine whether the notice of lapse has been sent to the insured.
of 2

(c) The insurer has no record of the current agent of record.
(d) The agent is employed by the insurer or an affiliate of the insurer.
of 2